California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(c) The State Department of Social Services shall work with representatives of county human services agencies and the County Welfare Directors Association of California for purposes of continuing to develop the casework metrics used for the budgeting of funding for employment services in the CalWORKs single allocation and to develop the budgeting methodology for welfare-to-work direct services during the 2019–20 fiscal year. As part of the process of developing this budgeting methodology, the department shall consult with legislative staff, advocate representatives, and labor organizations that represent county workers.

(d) The number of hours per case per month of case work time budgeted for intensive cases as
 defined pursuant to the budget methodology changes for the employment services component of the CalWORKs single allocation developed pursuant to this section shall be incrementally increased for each of the 2021–22 and 2022–23 fiscal years. Effective July 1, 2024, the number of hours per case per month of case work time budgeted for intensive cases shall be maintained at a minimum of 8.75 hours. Subject to an appropriation by the Legislature, the number of hours per case per month of case time budgeted for intensive cases shall be increased to no more than 10 hours.

(e) The State Department of Social Services, in consultation with representatives of county human services agencies and the County Welfare Directors Association of California, shall reconsider the costs of county operations for county administrative costs in the CalWORKs single allocation for the 2024–25 fiscal year, the 2028–29 fiscal year, and every third fiscal year thereafter. The State Department of Social Services shall provide information to the legislative budget committees regarding this reconsideration and how it may impact county administrative costs as part of the budget proposed by either January 10 or May 14 of any year prior to the fiscal year for which this provision applies.

(f) In implementing this section, the department shall consult with legislative staff, representatives of county human services agencies and the County Welfare Directors Association of California, advocate representatives, and labor organizations that represent county workers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 26, Sec. 26.   (AB 152)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

15204.4.

In addition to the funds received under Section 15204.2, counties shall be required to expend money from their own funds, either from the county’s general fund or from the social services account of the county health and welfare trust fund to support administration of programs providing services to needy families. Each county shall expend an amount for these programs that, when combined with funds expended under Section 18906.5 for administration of CalFresh, equals or exceeds the amount spent by that county for corresponding activities during the 1996–97 fiscal year. Failure to meet this required level of spending shall result in a proportionate reduction of the funds provided under Section 15204.2. In those cases the Director of Social Services shall report to the
 Legislature within 30 days his or her findings relative to the ability of the county, with reduced funds, to meet its obligations in administering the affected programs. The report shall include any relevant information related to the performance of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 64.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

15204.5.

The department shall establish and maintain a plan whereby costs for county administration of the payment of aid grants under this part will be effectively controlled within the amounts annually appropriated for such administration. The plan, to be known as the County Administrative Cost Control Plan, shall establish standards and performance criteria, including workload, productivity and support services standards, to which counties shall adhere. The plan shall be part of a single state plan, jointly developed by the department and the State Department of Health Care Services, in conjunction with the counties, for administrative cost control for the Aid to Families with Dependent Children (AFDC), CalFresh, and Medical Assistance (Medi-Cal) programs. Allocations
 shall be made to each county and shall be limited by and determined based upon the County Administrative Cost Control Plan. In administering the plan to control county administrative costs, the department shall not allocate state funds to cover county cost overruns which result from county failure to meet requirements of the plan. The department and the State Department of Health Care Services shall budget, administer, and allocate state funds for county administration in a uniform and a consistent manner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 65.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

15204.6.

(a) Contingent upon a Budget Act appropriation, a Pay for Performance Program shall provide additional funding for counties that meet the standards developed according to subdivision (c) in their welfare-to-work programs under Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 11320) of Chapter 2. The state shall have no obligation to pay incentives earned that exceed the funds appropriated for the year in which the incentives were earned.

(b) To the extent that funds are appropriated, the maximum total funds available to each county each year under the Pay for Performance Program shall be 5 percent of the funds the county receives that year, less the amount for child care, from the single allocation under Section 15204.2. If funds appropriated for this section are less than the incentives earned under this subdivision, each county’s allocation under this section shall be prorated based on the amount of funds appropriated for that year.

(c) The funds available to each county under the Pay for Performance Program shall be divided each year into as many equal parts as there are measures established for the year under this subdivision. A county shall earn payment of one equal part for each improvement standard that it achieves for the year or by ranking in the top 20 percent of all counties in a measure identified in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (4), and (5), except as provided in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4). Counties may receive a pro rata share of incentive funds for each improvement standard. The department shall consult with the County Welfare Directors Association, legislative staff, and other stakeholders, when developing improvement standards and the methodology for earning and distributing incentives for each of the following measures:

(1) The employment rate of county CalWORKs cases.

(2) The federal participation rates of county CalWORKs cases, calculated in accordance with Section 607 of Title 42 of the United States Code, but excluding individuals who are exempt in accordance with Section 11320.3 and including sanctioned cases and cases participating in activities described in subdivision (q) of Section 11322.6. If valid data does not exist to measure this outcome, the funds for this measure shall be made available for the Pay for Performance Program in the following fiscal year.

(3) The percentage of county CalWORKs cases that have earned income three months after ceasing to receive assistance under Section 11450.

(4) (A) The percentage of county CalWORKs cases, including cases that have ceased receiving assistance in the previous two quarters, with earned income that equals or exceeds the income level for the maximum EITC amount available to a household, as determined under Section 22 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(B) This paragraph shall only become operative if the department, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association, legislative staff, and other stakeholders, determines that implementing its provisions will not create a substantial risk of California failing to meet federal welfare-to-work participation goals, and shall remain operative for so long as the department does not reverse that determination.

(5) Any additional measures that the department may establish in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association, legislative staff, and other stakeholders.

(d) Performance measures, standards, outcomes, and payments to counties under subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) shall be based on the following schedule:

(1) For the performance measure described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), payments in fiscal year 2007–08 shall be based on outcomes for the period of July 1, 2006, through December 31, 2006, compared to outcomes for the period of January 1, 2007, through June 30, 2007, and payments in each subsequent fiscal year shall be based on outcomes for the fiscal year prior to payment, compared to outcomes for the fiscal year two years prior to payment.

(2) For all other performance measures, payments shall be based on outcomes for the fiscal year prior to payment, compared to outcomes for the fiscal year two years prior to payment.

(e) The department may make further adjustments to any of the performance measures listed under subdivision (c), in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association, legislative staff, and other stakeholders. The act that both amends subdivision (c) and enacts this sentence in the 2007–08 Regular Session of the Legislature shall not limit the department’s authority under this subdivision.

(f) The funds paid in accordance with this section may only be used in accordance with subdivisions (f) and (g) of Section 10544.1 and only for the purpose of enhancing family self-sufficiency. Funds earned by a county in accordance with this section shall be available for expenditure in the fiscal year that they are received and the following two fiscal years. Following the period of availability, and notwithstanding any provisions of subdivision (f) of Section 10544.1 to the contrary, any unspent balance shall revert to the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) block grant.

(g) Any funds appropriated by the Legislature for the Pay for Performance Program, but not earned by a county, shall revert to the TANF block grant at the end of the fiscal year for which the funds were appropriated.

(h) The department shall periodically publish the outcomes measured by the Pay for Performance Program, identified by county.

(i) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this section through all-county letters throughout the duration of the Pay for Performance Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 622, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15204.8.

(a) The Legislature may appropriate annually in the Budget Act funds to support services provided pursuant to Sections 11325.7 and 11325.8.

(b) Funds appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be allocated to the counties separately and shall be available for expenditure by the counties for services provided during the budget year. A county may move funds between the two accounts during the budget year for expenditure if necessary to meet the particular circumstances in the county. Any unexpended funds may be retained by each county for expenditure for the same purposes during the succeeding fiscal year. By November 20, 1998, each county shall report to the department on the
 use of these funds.

(c) Beginning January 10, 1999, the Department of Finance shall report annually to the Legislature on the extent to which funds available under subdivision (a) have not been spent and may reallocate the unexpended balances so as to better meet the need for services.

(d) No later than September 1, 2001, the department in consultation with relevant stakeholders, which may include the County Welfare Directors Association and the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, shall develop the allocation methodology for these funds, including the specific components to be considered in allocating the funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 455, Sec. 61.   (SB 804)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

15204.9.

(a) Prior to the 2011–12 fiscal year, the state shall pay 70 percent of the nonfederal administrative costs of administering the Aid to Families with Dependent Children Foster Care program under Article 5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Chapter 2.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), beginning in the 2011–12 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, funding and expenditures for programs and activities under this section shall be in
 accordance with the requirements provided in Sections 30025 and 30026.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 101.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

15205.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this article, there shall be deducted from the moneys appropriated to each county under this article a sum equal to the state and county shares of the public assistance grant that would otherwise be payable each month for each person transferred by the department to the Department of Rehabilitation for vocational rehabilitation pursuant to an agreement under Section 10652. In the case of a member or members of a family unit receiving aid to families with dependent children, the sum to be deducted and transferred shall be equal to the state and county shares of the public assistance grant on behalf of the family. Such sum shall be transferred in the Budget Act to the Department of Rehabilitation and used to provide vocational rehabilitation services for such persons as provided in Section 10652.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1369.)
-------------------------------------------

15206.

The department is hereby authorized to establish those administrative support positions necessary to carry out the provisions of Chapter 924 of the Statutes of 1975. These positions shall be 75 percent federally funded and 25 percent state funded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 504.)
-------------------------------------------

15207.

The county shall estimate the social security increases for the month of October and such estimated increase shall be taken into consideration in determining eligibility for and the amount of the October 1, 1972, grant for recipients of aid under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 13000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 504.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9.5. Supportive Care Organizations [15300. - 15451.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [15300. - 15301.]

15300.

The Legislature finds that:

(a) Elderly persons, like any other persons, prefer to remain in their own homes rather than in dependent living situations, including long-term care facilities.

(b) Many elderly persons, with a minimal to moderate amount of supportive services, mainly nonmedical in character, could maintain themselves at home; others, with slightly more support and perhaps day care supervision, could remain in independent living situations or homes of relatives or friends. Yet it is just this nonmedical, nontechnical level of supportive services that is largely unavailable to the vast majority of old persons.

(c) Most elderly persons living on fixed incomes cannot afford private help or the cost of home health or homemaker agencies; elderly low-income public assistance recipients can receive such care only in limited circumstances under welfare cash grant attendant care or homemaker programs.

(d) Supportive personal and social care in many cases enables the elderly to maintain a state of health that decreases or postpones the need for health care. 

(e) Reducing or postponing the need for health care is not only beneficial to the elderly individual’s general welfare but also results in economic savings both to the individual, his or her family, and the people of California in cases where the elderly person is also a recipient of public assistance or potentially in need of public funds through cash grants, Medi-Cal, or use of state or county facilities.

(f) Titles XVIII and XIX of the Social Security Act are largely concerned with crisis or short-term care; there are no adequate programs, public or private, which financially assist the elderly person to maintain his independence, health and mobility at home.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 992.)
-------------------------------------------

15301.

The purpose of this chapter is to use on an experimental pilot project basis, two model supportive care projects supervised by the State Department of Aging.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [15325. - 15325.]

15325.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this section govern the construction of this chapter.

(a) “Project” means a model supportive services project supervised by the State Department of Aging.

(b) “Office” means the State Department of Aging.

(c) “Elderly persons” means persons aged 60 and over.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Scope of Services [15350. - 15352.]

15350.

The projects shall specifically delineate the scope and nature of services to be offered to participants. Services shall include:

(a) Assistance with shopping.

(b) Assistance with meal preparation.

(c) Assistance with laundry.

(d) Assistance with home upkeep and management.

(e) Help with personal care and dressing.

(f) Transportation to any offered services not available at the participant’s home.

(g) Counseling and information and referral services on financial, relocation, legal and other matters.

(h) Geriatric diagnostic health clinics at specified and limited places and times.

(i) A coordinating service for emergency and crisis intervention.

(j) Limited medical services, plus emergency medicine.

(k) Physical therapy (planned functional restitution).

(l) Social services.

(m) A hot meal per day.

(n) Social activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 992.)
-------------------------------------------

15351.

Projects may offer day care centers providing necessary meals, personal care and therapeutic activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 992.)
-------------------------------------------

15352.

Supportive care organization services shall be made available as needed. “Need” determinations shall be made jointly by the participants and project’s staff. Any disagreements shall be appealable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 992.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Eligibility and Enrollment [15375. - 15377.]

15375.

Projects shall establish eligibility criteria in order that a mix is obtained which will include both short-term and long-term participants who will make maximum use of the projects’ resources. Priorities must be explained in full prior to contracting with the department and may be modified by the project, with departmental approval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

15376.

Participants shall be charged on a sliding-fee scale basis which is reasonably related to ability to pay. An effort shall be made by the projects to give priority to low-income elderly persons. The department shall develop guidelines regarding the fees for service. The department shall make every effort to obtain necessary waivers for use of Medicare and Medicaid funds for services offered by the projects. The purposes of obtaining such waivers is to provide for the type of care specified in Sections 15350 and 15351, in addition to and not in lieu of any existing benefits currently available under the Medicare and Medicaid programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

15377.

No copayment charges shall be imposed upon Medi-Cal enrollees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 992.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Administration [15400. - 15406.]

15400.

The supportive care organization shall make a concerted effort to employ persons over the age of 40 when such qualified personnel are available.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 992.)
-------------------------------------------

15401.

The project shall provide a single standard record for each participant, and shall cooperate with subcontractors and providers of noncovered services to maintain a complete unit record for each participant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 992.)
-------------------------------------------

15402.

The projects shall provide to the department and to the participants such statistical information regarding utilization of services, age and sex, specific mortality and morbidity rates, patient discomfort, patient disability, patient satisfaction, services supplied, quality of care, manpower resources, and class of health care and administration, compiled from its basic data system, as the department may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

15403.

The projects shall establish procedures for continuous review of utilization and cost of services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 992.)
-------------------------------------------

15404.

Participation in a supportive care project plan shall be voluntary and the project shall not use false advertising or any other form of coercion to induce enrollment. Failure to comply with this section will constitute a substantial breach of contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 992.)
-------------------------------------------

15405.

A participant grievance procedure must be established by the project through which an aggrieved participant may submit his complaint to the project which will hear and take action on the complaint.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 992.)
-------------------------------------------

15406.

If the participant is not satisfied with the project’s disposition of his grievance, he may appeal the project’s decision to the department. The department shall make a written determination within 30 days. Findings and recommendations of the department shall be binding upon the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Implementation and Evaluation [15450. - 15451.]

15450.

The department shall request such waivers as are necessary for the use of health care moneys provided under Titles XVIII and XIX of the Social Security Act from the Department of Health, Education and Welfare for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

15451.

Only federal funds may be used for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 992.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Supplemental Food Program [15500. - 15520.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [15500. - 15504.]

15500.

Unless the context otherwise requires the definitions set forth in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1195.)
-------------------------------------------

15501.

“Supplemental food” means commodities specifically made available by the United States Department of Agriculture for persons in low-income groups vulnerable to malnutrition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1195.)
-------------------------------------------

15502.

“Groups vulnerable to malnutrition” means women during and for 12 months after pregnancy, infants through 12 months, and preschool children 1 year through 5 years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1195.)
-------------------------------------------

15503.

Persons from low-income groups include the following:

(a) Persons receiving medical assistance under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of this part.

(b) Persons qualified to receive free health care or health care that is substantially free provided by the Office of Economic Opportunity’s Neighborhood Health Center Program or state, county, or local public health services.

(c) Persons eligible for treatment, correction of defects, or aftercare in the children and youth projects of the Department of Health, Education, and Welfare.

(d) Indians receiving free medical and health care from the Division of Indian Health, United States Public Health Service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1195.)
-------------------------------------------

15504.

Public social services as defined in Section 10051 also includes the supplemental food program provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1195.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [15510. - 15514.]

15510.

The director shall administer the provisions of this chapter and shall adopt such rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

15511.

The county welfare department shall carry out the local administrative responsibilities of this chapter, subject to the supervision of the department and to rules and regulations adopted by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1195.)
-------------------------------------------

15512.

Application for supplemental food shall be made to the county welfare agency who shall determine program eligibility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1195.)
-------------------------------------------

15513.

The county welfare department shall contract with the local health department to determine the need of eligible persons for the nutrients in supplemental food and the local health department shall issue prescriptions for such food in specified amounts and varieties judged necessary for such persons health.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1195.)
-------------------------------------------

15514.

The California State Education Agency for Surplus Property shall procure, store, handle, and dispose of supplemental food under rules and regulations of the department established pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1195.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Fiscal Provisions [15520. - 15520.]

15520.

The department shall pay the nonfederal share of the administration of program pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1195.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10.1. Work Incentive Nutritional Supplement [15525. - 15525.]

15525.

(a) The State Department of Social Services shall establish a Work Incentive Nutritional Supplement (WINS) program pursuant to this section.

(b) Under the WINS program established pursuant to subdivision (a), each county shall provide a ten-dollar ($10) per month additional food assistance benefit for each eligible CalFresh household, as defined in subdivision (d).

(c) The state shall pay to the counties 100 percent of the cost of WINS benefits.

(d) For purposes of this section, an “eligible CalFresh household” is a household that meets all of the following criteria:

(1) Receives benefits pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6.

(2) Has no household member receiving CalWORKs benefits pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200).

(3) Contains at least one child under 18 years of age, unless the household contains a child who meets the requirements of Section 11253.

(4) Has at least one parent or caretaker relative determined to be “work eligible,” as defined in Section 261.2(n) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations and Section 607 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(5) Meets the federal work participation hours requirement set forth in Section 607 of Title 42 of the United States Code for subsidized or unsubsidized employment, and provides documentation that
 the household has met the federal work requirements.

(e) (1) In accordance with federal law, federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits administered in California as CalFresh (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6), federal supplemental security income benefits, state supplemental security program benefits, public social services, as defined in Section 10051, and county aid benefits (Part 5 (commencing with Section 17000)), shall not be reduced as a consequence of the receipt of the WINS benefit paid under this chapter.

(2) Benefits paid under this chapter shall not count toward the federal 60-month time limit on aid, as set forth in Section 608(a)(7)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code. Payment of WINS benefits shall not commence before January 1, 2014, and full implementation of the program shall be achieved on or before
 July 1, 2014.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and Section 10554), until emergency regulations are filed with the Secretary of State pursuant to paragraph (2), the State Department of Social Services may implement this section through all-county letters or similar instructions. The department may provide for individual county phase-in of this section to allow for the orderly implementation based upon standards established by the department, including the operational needs and requirements of the counties. Implementation of the automation process changes shall include issuance of an all-county letter or similar instructions to counties by June 1, 2013.

(2) The department may adopt regulations to implement
 this chapter. The initial adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation authorized by this section is deemed to address an emergency, for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the department is hereby exempted for that purpose from the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code. After the initial adoption, amendment, or repeal of an emergency regulation pursuant to this paragraph, the department may request approval from the Office of Administrative Law to readopt the regulation as an emergency regulation pursuant to Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(g) (1) The department shall not fully implement this section until the department convenes a workgroup of advocates, legislative staff, county representatives, and other stakeholders to consider the progress of the WINS automation effort in tandem with a pre-assistance employment readiness system (PAERS)
 program and any other program options that may provide offsetting benefits to the caseload reduction credit in the CalWORKs program. The department shall convene this workgroup on or before December 1, 2013.

(2) A PAERS program shall be considered in light of current and potential federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) statutes and regulations and how other states with pre-assistance or other caseload offset options are responding to federal changes.

(3) The consideration of program options shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, the potential impacts on helping clients to obtain self-sufficiency, increasing the federal work participation rate, increasing the caseload reduction credit, requirements and efficiency of county administration, and the well-being of CalWORKs recipients.

(4) If the
 workgroup concludes that adopting a PAERS program or other program option pursuant to this section would, on balance, be favorable for California and its CalWORKs recipients, the department, in consultation with the workgroup, shall prepare a proposal by March 31, 2014, for consideration during the regular legislative budget subcommittee process in 2014.

(5) To meet the requirements of this subdivision, the department may use its TANF reauthorization workgroups.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 100.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Elder Abuse and Dependent Adult Civil Protection Act [15600. - 15675.]



  ARTICLE 1. Legislative Findings and Intent [15600. - 15601.]

15600.

(a) The Legislature recognizes that elders and dependent adults may be subjected to abuse, neglect, or abandonment and that this state has a responsibility to protect these persons. 

(b) The Legislature further recognizes that a significant number of these persons are elderly. The Legislature desires to direct special attention to the needs and problems of elderly persons, recognizing that these persons constitute a significant and identifiable segment of the population and that they are more subject to risks of abuse, neglect, and abandonment. 

(c) The Legislature further recognizes that a significant number of these persons have developmental disabilities and that mental and verbal limitations often leave them vulnerable to abuse and incapable of asking for help and protection. 

(d) The Legislature recognizes that most elders and dependent adults who are at the greatest risk of abuse, neglect, or abandonment by their families or caretakers suffer physical impairments and other poor health that place them in a dependent and vulnerable position.

(e) The Legislature further recognizes that factors which contribute to abuse, neglect, or abandonment of elders and dependent adults are economic instability of the family, resentment of caretaker responsibilities, stress on the caretaker, and abuse by the caretaker of drugs or alcohol. 

(f) The Legislature declares that this state shall foster and promote community services for the economic, social, and personal well-being of its citizens in order to protect those persons described in this section. 

(g) The Legislature further declares that uniform state guidelines, which specify when county adult protective service agencies are to investigate allegations of abuse of elders and dependent adults and the appropriate role of local law enforcement is necessary in order to ensure that a minimum level of protection is provided to elders and dependent adults in each county.

(h) The Legislature further finds and declares that infirm elderly persons and dependent adults are a disadvantaged class, that cases of abuse of these persons are seldom prosecuted as criminal matters, and few civil cases are brought in connection with this abuse due to problems of proof, court delays, and the lack of incentives to prosecute these suits.

(i) Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to provide that adult protective services agencies, local long-term care ombudsman programs, and local law enforcement agencies shall receive referrals or complaints from public or private agencies, from any mandated reporter submitting reports pursuant to Section 15630, or from any other source having reasonable cause to know that the welfare of an elder or dependent adult is endangered, and shall take any actions considered necessary to protect the elder or dependent adult and correct the situation and ensure the individual’s safety. 

(j) It is the further intent of the Legislature in adding Article 8.5 (commencing with Section 15657) to this chapter to enable interested persons to engage attorneys to take up the cause of abused elderly persons and dependent adults.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 594, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

15601.

The purposes of this act are to:

(a) Require health practitioners, care custodians, clergy members, and employees of county adult protective services agencies and local law enforcement agencies to report known or suspected cases of abuse of elders and dependent adults and to encourage community members in general to do so.

(b) Collect information on the numbers of abuse victims, circumstances surrounding the act of abuse, and other data which will aid the state in establishing adequate services to aid all victims of abuse in a timely, compassionate manner.

(c) Provide for protection under the law for all those persons who report suspected cases of abuse, provided that the report is not made with malicious intent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 54, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [15610. - 15610.70.]

15610.

The definitions contained in this article shall govern the construction of this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 594, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

15610.02.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The adult protective services program (program), established by the Legislature as a statewide program in 1998, is a critical component of the state’s safety net for vulnerable adults.

(2) The population served by the county-run, state-overseen program has grown and changed significantly since the program’s inception and will continue to do so at a rapid pace, given the increasing number of older adults in California. California’s over-65 years of age population is expected to be 87 percent higher in 2030 than in 2012, an increase of more than 4,000,000 people. The population over 85 years of age will increase
 at an even faster rate, with 489 percent growth between 2010 and 2060.

(3) The increasing population of older adults often has more complex needs, including persons with cognitive impairments and a growing number of those experiencing homelessness. Research indicates that approximately 50 percent of homeless individuals are over 50 years of age, and one-half of those individuals became homeless after 50 years of age.

(b) In order to address the safety and well-being of the growing number of diverse older adults who will need adult protective services, it is the intent of the Legislature to enhance the program in a number of ways, including enabling the program to provide longer term case management for those with more complex cases, expanding and making more flexible the Home Safe Program to aid clients facing homelessness, and encouraging the use of collaborative,
 multidisciplinary best practices across the state, including financial abuse specialist teams and forensic centers. It is further the intent of the Legislature to expand the age of clients served under the program in order to intervene earlier with aging adults before their situations reach a crisis point.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 62.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

15610.05.

“Abandonment” means the desertion or willful forsaking of an elder or a dependent adult by anyone having care or custody of that person under circumstances in which a reasonable person would continue to provide care and custody.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 594, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

15610.06.
